Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-515
Educational service unit board; terms; qualifications; nonpartisan ballot.

Candidates for the boards of educational service units, except boards of educational service units with only one member school district, shall be elected to represent the geographical boundaries of the educational service unit as provided in section 79-1217. The terms of members elected in 2008 to represent odd-numbered election districts established pursuant to section 79-1217.01 shall expire in 2011. The terms of members elected in 2008 to represent even-numbered election districts established under such section shall expire in 2013. Successors to the members elected in 2008 shall be elected for terms of four years. Candidates for the board of educational service units shall meet the qualifications found in section 79-1217. Board members shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 111;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1039;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 2.